Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 5
SINGLE PURPOSE SERVICE DISTRICTS

32-5-101 to 32-5-346. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article repealed, p. 1628, § 42, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 16 of chapter 36 and articles 6 and 14 of chapter 89, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1981, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.